Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6016YH (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2465 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 12.29 Commemorative coins. 1 1. The treasurer of state shall issue gold, silver, and 2 platinum coins that are stamped with images commemorating the 3 state of Iowa and the tenure of governor Kimberly Reynolds. 4 2. The treasurer of state shall make each coin available for 5 sale to the public at a price not to exceed one hundred seven 6 percent of the value of the metal used to create the coin at the 7 time of the sale. 8